Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 44 Mobile and Manufactured Homes

31-44-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Department” means the department of business regulation.

“Director” means the director of the department of business regulation.

“Entry requirements” means any written, nondiscriminatory criteria for resident selection incorporated into the rules and regulations of a mobile- and manufactured-home park which are equally applied by the licensee to all purchasers and prospective residents.

“Fee schedule” means an itemized list of fees for goods or services sold or performed by a mobile- and manufactured-home park licensee including, but not limited to, the entrance fee, hook-up fee, and maintenance fee, if any.

“Hook-up fee” means a reasonable fee for the services required to install a mobile and manufactured home on a mobile- and manufactured-home space or lot. The charge shall include the cost of connecting water and sewer lines, electrical connections, tie-downs, removal of wheels or axles, steps, if necessary, and other necessary services, including, but not limited to, the creation of new pads or piers.

“Household” means one or more persons occupying a housing unit.

“Licensee” means any person or agent licensed under §

31-44-1.6

who is directly or indirectly engaged in the business of selling mobile and manufactured homes or who operates and maintains a mobile- and manufactured-home park under the provisions of this chapter.

“Mobile and manufactured home” means a detached residential unit designed:

For a long term occupancy and containing sleeping accommodations, a flush toilet, and a tub or shower bath and kitchen facilities, and having both permanent plumbing and electrical connections for attachment to outside systems;

To be transported on its own wheels or on a flatbed or other trailer or detachable wheels; and

To be placed on pads, piers, or tied down, at the site where it is to be occupied as a residence complete and ready for occupancy, except for minor and incidental unpacking and assembly operations and connection to utilities systems.

“Mobile- and manufactured-home park” or “park” means a plot of ground upon which four (4) or more mobile and manufactured homes, occupied for residential purposes are located.

“Mobile- and manufactured-home space or lot” means a plot of ground within a mobile- and manufactured-home park designed for the accommodation of one mobile and manufactured home.

“Owner” means a licensee or permittee or any person who owns, operates, or maintains a mobile- and manufactured-home park.

“Prospective resident” means an applicant for admission to a mobile- and manufactured-home park who is ready, willing, and able to buy a mobile and manufactured home owned and offered for sale by a licensee or resident, and who is able to meet the entrance requirements of the rules of the park.

“Protected lawful action” means any report of a violation of this chapter, or of any applicable building or health code, or any other justified complaint to a governmental authority, or any other justified lawful act by the resident(s) or prospective resident(s).

“Qualified sale” means the sale of a mobile- and manufactured-home park to a resident organization with the goal of resident ownership by at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the homeowner households residing in the park.

“Reprisal” means any act taken against the resident(s) which is intended as a penalty for any protected lawful action taken by the resident(s).

“Resident” means an owner or renter occupying a mobile and manufactured home in a mobile- and manufactured-home park with the consent of the owner as defined in subdivision (11) of this section.

“Resident organization” means a group of mobile- and manufactured-home park residents who have formed a nonprofit corporation, cooperative corporation, or other entity or organization for the purpose of acquiring the mobile home park in which they reside and converting the mobile home park to resident ownership.

“Resident ownership” means, depending on the context, either the ownership, by a resident organization, as defined in this section, of an interest in a mobile- and manufactured-home park which entitles the resident organization to control the operations of the mobile home park, or the ownership of individual interests in a mobile home park, or both.

“Security deposit” means a sum not to exceed the monthly rental which a licensee may require a resident of a rented mobile or manufactured home to deposit as security in case of damage caused by the resident in excess of ordinary wear and tear.

“Standards for mobile and manufactured homes” means any written, nondiscriminatory minimum specifications for structural soundness, safety, and habitability adopted by the department or any other government agency.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 382, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 150, § 41; P.L. 1993, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 198, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 134, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 248, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 364, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 391, § 1.

31-44-1.1 — 31-44-1.3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 309, §§ 4, 5; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 134, § 1, effective July 1, 1995.

31-44-1.4.
Powers and duties of department.

The department may:

Interpret and implement the provisions of this chapter and the applicable provisions of chapter 44.1 of this title;

Act for the purpose of promoting a uniform policy relating to all phases of mobile and manufactured home business and use;

Monitor and determine the sufficiency of the state Mobile and Manufactured Home Act under this chapter as well as local mobile and manufactured home ordinances which are designed to provide local governments with superintending control over mobile and manufactured home business or use and to make recommendations to it; and

Conduct public hearings relating to these advisory responsibilities.

The department shall:

Monitor the implementation of statutes and regulations affecting mobile and manufactured homes;

Make investigations and conduct or authorize periodic surveys to determine compliance with this chapter;

All departments of state government are authorized to provide assistance to the department as the department requires;

Conduct a public education program to improve public perception and local acceptance of mobile and manufactured homes and to promote them as affordable housing; and

Study additional issues related to mobile and manufactured homes and periodically disseminate acquired information.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 382, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 357, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 134, § 2.

31-44-1.5.
Mobile and manufactured home advisory information.

The department may publish and promote mobile and manufactured home advisory information based on this chapter and other issues as set forth in §

31-44-1.4

. The information shall consist of:

A general interpretation of the rights and responsibilities of mobile and manufactured home park licensees and mobile home owners and residents as established by this chapter; and

Local state and federal standards to protect the health, safety, and welfare of mobile and manufactured home park residents.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 382, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 134, § 2.

31-44-1.6.
Fees and charges for licenses.

The department of business regulation shall promulgate rules to establish fees and charges for the issuance of licenses or permits required in this chapter.

The fees and charges under this chapter shall be applied solely to fulfilling the various responsibilities of the department as specified within this chapter.

All fees and charges collected by the department under this chapter shall be deposited as general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 382, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 106; P.L. 1999, ch. 248, § 1.

31-44-1.7.
Mobile and manufactured home park operation — License.

A person shall not operate a mobile and manufactured home park without a license.

Upon completion, review, and approval of certifications, the department of business regulation shall grant a license to operate a mobile and manufactured home park.

An annual license shall be granted and renewed by the department based upon the filing of:

Leases and regulations that are applicable to the park;

Certification by the municipality in which the park is located that it is in compliance with all applicable land use regulations of the municipality;

Certification from the appropriate state agencies or municipal departments that the park has an adequate and operational sewage disposal system and water supply and that all applicable state and local taxes have been paid;

Payment of an annual fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) per occupied site in the park; and

The applicant files a fee schedule with the department.

Certifications for individual sewage disposal systems (ISDS) regulated by the department of environmental management shall be provided by an ISDS designer, licensed pursuant to §

5-56-1

, who possesses the appropriate class of license for the type and size of system to be certified and any costs for these certifications shall be the responsibility of the licensee. The director of the department may by regulation provide for additional requirements and may place reasonable conditions on the grant of any license.

If a person submits a timely application for renewal of a license and pays the appropriate fees, the person may continue to operate a mobile and manufactured home park unless notified that the application for renewal is not approved. In the event anyone is denied a license he or she will be afforded a hearing before the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 382, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 248, § 1.

31-44-1.8.
Survey of parks.

The department of health or its authorized representatives shall conduct a survey every three (3) years of mobile and manufactured home parks.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 382, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 487, § 1.

31-44-2.
Evictions — Termination of tenancy.

A tenancy may be terminated by a park owner or operator pursuant to chapter 18 of title 34, provided, that jurisdiction as it relates to this chapter shall be in the district court but subject to one or more of the following reasons and limitations which shall take precedence over any conflicting state statute or local ordinance:

Nonpayment of rent, utility charges, or reasonable incidental service charges. No action for possession shall be maintained if prior to the expiration of a notice to quit the tenant shall pay or tender all arrearages due, including a late charge of five percent (5%) of the monthly rent due after a seven (7) day grace period for the rental payment has elapsed.

Failure of the tenant to comply with local ordinances or state or federal law or regulations relating to mobile and manufactured homes or mobile and manufactured home parks. The tenant is first given written notice of his or her failure to comply with the laws or regulations and a reasonable opportunity thereafter to comply with the laws or regulations.

Damage by the tenant to the demised property, reasonable wear and tear excepted.

Repeated conduct of the tenant, upon the mobile and manufactured home park premises, which disturbs the peace and quiet of other tenants in the mobile and manufactured home park.

Failure of the tenant to comply with reasonable written rules and regulations of the mobile and manufactured home park as established by the park owner or operator in the rental agreement at the inception of the tenancy or as amended subsequently with the written acknowledgement that the tenant has seen the amended rules, or without his or her consent upon three (3) months written notice; provided that the tenant is first given written notice of his or her failure to comply and a reasonable opportunity thereafter to comply with the rules and regulations. Nothing in this section, however, shall be construed to permit a park owner or operator to vary the terms of a written or oral rental agreement without notification to the tenant.

Condemnation or change of use of the mobile and manufactured home park.

No tenancy, however created, in a mobile and manufactured home park may be terminated by a mobile and manufactured home park owner or operator except upon giving notice in writing to the tenant in the manner prescribed in this chapter to remove from the premises within a period of not less than sixty (60) days; provided that upon grounds of nonpayment of rent, a tenancy may be terminated upon giving thirty (30) days notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 382, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 45.

31-44-3.
Rules and regulations.

The following requirements and restrictions shall apply to all mobile- and manufactured-home parks:

A mobile- and manufactured-home park licensee shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations that shall specify standards for mobile and manufactured homes in the park, entry requirements, and rules governing the rental or occupancy of a mobile- and manufactured-home lot and mobile- and manufactured-home park;

Current rules and regulations promulgated by a mobile- and manufactured-home park licensee shall be delivered by the licensee to a prospective resident prior to entering into a rental agreement, and to the resident(s) as soon as promulgated and whenever revised. A copy of the rules and regulations shall be filed with the director and posted in a conspicuous place in the mobile- and manufactured-home park;

Any rule or change in rent that does not apply uniformly to all mobile- and manufactured-home residents of a similar class shall create a rebuttable presumption that the rule or change in rent is unreasonable;

A mobile- and manufactured-home park licensee shall not impose any conditions of rental or occupancy that restricts the mobile- and manufactured-home owner in his or her choice of a seller of fuel, furnishings, goods, services, accessories, or other utilities connected with the rental or occupancy of a mobile- and manufactured-home lot;

The licensee who purchases electricity or gas (natural, manufactured, or similar gaseous substance) from any public utility or municipally owned utility or who purchases water from a water system for the purpose of supplying or reselling the electricity or gas to any other person to whom he leases, lets, rents, subleases, sublets, or subrents the premises upon which the electricity, gas, or water is to be used, shall not charge, demand, or receive directly or indirectly, any amount for the resale of any electricity, gas, or water greater than that amount charged by the public utility or municipally owned utility from which the electricity, gas, or water was purchased or by the public water system from which the water was purchased;

However, if the licensee incurs costs in bringing the utility service to individual units, or in utilizing individual meters, or in some similar cost, the licensee will be entitled to a return for the investment;

The park operator shall post in a conspicuous place the prevailing utility rate schedule as published by the serving utility;

If any mobile- and manufactured-home park licensee adds, changes, deletes, or amends any rule governing the rental or occupancy of a mobile- and manufactured-home lot in a mobile- and manufactured-home park, a new copy of all those rules shall be furnished to all mobile- and manufactured-home residents in the park, and filed with the department for its review, recommendations, and recording for future reference at least forty-five (45) days prior to the effective date of the addition, change, deletion, or amendment. The new copy furnished to the resident shall be signed by both the mobile- and manufactured-home park owner and the mobile- and manufactured-home park resident. Any mobile park resident who believes the rule change is in violation of the chapter, may file a complaint with the director in accordance with §

31-44-17

. The complaint shall be filed within twenty (20) days of receipt of written notice of the change. The complaint shall specify the rule in dispute and contain the basis by which the change violates this chapter;

If any mobile- and manufactured-home park licensee changes the rent or fees associated with a mobile- and manufactured-home lot, notice of the change shall be given to the mobile- and manufactured-home resident at least sixty (60) days prior to the effective date of the change. Any mobile park resident who believes that the rule change is in violation of this chapter, may file a complaint with the director in accordance with §

31-44-17

. The complaint shall be filed within twenty (20) days after receipt of written notice of the change. The complaint shall specify the basis by which the change violates this chapter;

The owners of individual mobile and manufactured homes shall be entitled to have as many occupants in their homes as is consistent with the number of bedrooms and/or bed spaces certified by the manufacturer; provided that the occupancy does not violate any provision of the general laws or other municipal regulations. All bedrooms shall consist of a minimum of fifty square feet (50 sq. ft.) of floor area and bedrooms designed and certified for two (2) or more people shall consist of seventy square feet (70 sq. ft.) of floor area plus fifty square feet (50 sq. ft.) for each person in excess of two (2). If there is sufficient bed space, according to the criteria set forth in this subdivision, additional rent or charges may not be imposed by a park owner or manager for any person or persons moving in with current resident owners of a mobile and manufactured home;

A prospective resident shall not be charged an entrance fee for the privilege of leasing or occupying a mobile- and manufactured-home lot, except as provided in §

31-44-4

; provided, that when a mobile and manufactured home is transported onto the mobile- and manufactured-home park, an entrance fee may be charged. However, if the park owner received a commission for the sale of the mobile and manufactured home, no entrance fee shall be charged. A reasonable charge for the fair value of the owner’s cost in obtaining, preparing, and maintaining a lot, or for the fair value of services performed in placing a mobile and manufactured home on a lot, shall not be considered an entrance fee, but shall be deemed a hook-up fee or maintenance fee and shall be detailed in the fee schedule. No tenant, or person seeking space in a mobile- and manufactured-housing park, shall be required to purchase manufactured housing from any particular person unless the person designated is the park owner or operator and the requirement is imposed only in connection with the initial leasing or renting of a newly-constructed lot or space not previously leased or rented to any other person. A resident may remove and replace a mobile and manufactured home; provided, that the resident shall install the mobile and manufactured home in accordance with present park standards regarding structural requirements and aesthetic maintenance in the mobile- and manufactured-home park where the replacement occurs, and in accordance with minimum standards for mobile and manufactured homes established by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development. No fee shall be charged by the licensee to residents as a result of the resident’s installation of cable television;

Prior to signing a lease, a licensee shall disclose, in writing, to the prospective resident:

The rental for the space or lot; and

Any charges, including service charges, imposed by the licensee. The licensee shall disclose the rent and charges that were in effect during the three (3) preceding years, or the period during which the licensee has operated the mobile home park, whichever is shorter;

A copy of the fee schedule shall be filed with the commission and posted in a conspicuous place in the mobile- and manufactured-home park; and

A resident shall not be charged a fee for keeping a pet in a mobile- and manufactured-home park unless the park owner or management actually provides special facilities or services for pets. If special pet facilities are maintained by the park owner or management, the fee charged shall reasonably relate to the cost of maintenance of the facilities or services and the number of pets kept in the park;

If the park owner or management of a mobile- and manufactured-home park implements a rule or regulation prohibiting residents from keeping pets in the park, the new rule or regulation shall not apply to prohibit the residents from continuing to keep the pets currently in the park if the pet otherwise conforms with the previous park rules or regulations relating to pets. However, if the pet dies, the resident shall have the right to replace the pet;

Any rule or regulation prohibiting residents from keeping pets in a mobile- and manufactured-home park shall not apply to guide, signal, or service animals;

Any board or commission vested with governing powers over a mobile- or manufactured-home community, including resident-owned and nonresident-owned mobile home park resident associations, shall establish and/or adhere to fair and impartial written guidelines and bylaws for conducting elections that have been provided to all residents of the mobile home park at least forty-five (45) days prior to any election. The written guidelines and bylaws shall ensure transparency in the election process with reasonable and meaningful notice to, and participation of, all residents. The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this subsection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 382, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 88, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 414, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 116, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 287, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 248, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 349, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 378, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 1, § 19.

31-44-3.1.
Sale of mobile home parks — Tenants association right of first refusal.

In any instance in which a mobile home park owner has been sent a certified letter from an incorporated home owner households association indicating that the association has at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the home owner households residing within that park as members, and has articles of incorporation specifying all rights and powers, including the power to negotiate for, acquire, and operate the mobile home park on behalf of the member residents, then, before a mobile home park may be sold for any purpose and before it may be leased for any purpose that would result in a discontinuance, the owner shall notify the association by certified mail return receipt requested of any bona fide offer that the owner intends to accept, to buy the park or to lease it for a use that would result in a discontinuance. The park owner shall also give notice by certified mail return receipt requested to the incorporated homeowners’ association of any intention to sell or lease the park for a use which will result in a discontinuance within fourteen (14) days of any advertisement or other public notice by the owner or his or her agent that the park is for sale or the land upon which the park is located is for lease. Nothing in this section shall limit the association from acting as an agent of the residents in any other cause of action, objective or purpose in advancing a stated purpose in the articles of incorporation of the homeowners’ association.

The notice of pending bona fide sale from the owner must contain at a minimum the following if known and available and applicable to the sale:

An affidavit from the buyer or lessee stating the offered purchase price or offered lease payment;

The terms of seller financing, including the amount, the interest rate and its amortization rate;

The terms of assumable financing, if any, including the amount, the interest rate and its amortization rate;

The legal description and a statement of appraised or assessed value of property included in any land trade involved in the sale of the park;

Proposed improvements to the property to be made by the owner in connection with the sale, or other economic concessions by the owner in connection with the sale, if any;

A statement that the owner will allow reasonable access to the property by parties involved in the potential purchase including, but not limited to, the tenants’ association, consultants, and lenders;

A statement that the owner will make available to the residents copies of any easements either on or off the property to which the owner is a party and copies of all permits or licenses in force within seven (7) days of a signed purchase and sale agreement with the residents;

A statement that the owner will make available to the residents a survey and legal description of the park, plus an itemized list of monthly operating expenses, utility consumption rates, taxes, insurance and capital expenditures for each of the past three (3) years within seven (7) days of a signed purchase and sale agreement with the residents;

A statement that the owner will make available to the tenants’ association the most recent rent roll, a list of tenants, a list of vacant units and a statement of the vacancy rate at the park for the three (3) preceding calendar years within seven (7) days of a signed purchase and sale agreement with the residents;

A statement that the owner will make available to the tenants’ association any available data relating to the past and present existence of hazardous waste either on the property or in close proximity within seven (7) days of a signed purchase and sale agreement with the residents;

A statement that the owner will make available to the tenants’ association any available data relating to the water, sewer and electrical systems of the park within seven (7) days of a signed purchase and sale agreement with the residents;

A statement that the owner will make available to the tenants’ association all income and operating expenses relating to the property to be purchased for the three (3) preceding calendar years within seven (7) days of a signed purchase and sale agreement with the residents and any other information that may be required by the lender. Any additional information that is required by the lender shall be kept strictly confidential.

Any incorporated home owners’ association entitled to notice under this section shall have the right to purchase, in the case of a third party bona fide offer to purchase, or to lease in the case of a third party bona fide offer to lease, the park, provided it meets the same price and the same terms and conditions of any offer of which it is entitled to notice under this section by:

Executing a contract or purchase and sale or lease agreement with the owner within forty-five (45) days of notice of the offer; and

Obtaining any necessary financing or guarantees within an additional one hundred thirty-five (135) days.

No owner shall unreasonably refuse to enter into, or unreasonably delay the execution of a purchase and sale or lease agreement with a home owners’ association that has made a bona fide offer to meet the same price and the same terms and conditions of an offer for which notice is required to be given pursuant to this section.

The deposit monies must be credited to the purchase price of the mobile home park.

The incorporated home owners’ association will use diligent efforts to obtain a commitment for financing from a lender by making immediate application for financing upon signing of the purchase and sale agreement. In the event that the incorporated home owners’ association, with the exercise of reasonable efforts, is unable to obtain necessary financing or comply with other contingencies of the purchase and sale agreement, the incorporated home owners’ association shall immediately notify the park owner and the deposit shall be returned to the incorporated home owners’ association.

If the incorporated home owners’ association shall default in the performance of its obligations as a purchaser under the terms of the purchase and sale agreement, the park owner shall have, as sole and exclusive remedy for the default, the right to retain the deposit as liquidated damages in full settlement and discharge of all obligations of the incorporated home owners’ association without further recourse in law or equity.

Failure of the incorporated home owners’ association to execute a purchase and sale agreement or lease within the forty-five (45) day period or to obtain a binding commitment for financing within the one hundred thirty-five (135) day period shall serve to terminate the right of the association to purchase or lease the mobile park home.

Residents shall have a total of one hundred eighty (180) days from the receipt of notice of a bona fide sale to complete a transaction under the right of first refusal legislation. Any delays by the seller in supplying requested information as stated in this legislation or any delay resulting from litigation involving the sale and/or litigation affecting the marketability of the title of the mobile home park shall result in the same number of days over the due date being added to the one hundred eighty (180) days available to the residents for a right of first refusal purchase unless the litigation is frivolous and prompted for the sole purpose of delay by the home owners association.

The time periods provided in this section may be extended by agreement of the association and the owner.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an owner to provide financing to any association or to prohibit an owner from requiring an association which is offering to lease a park to have within its possession a sum equivalent to the capitalized value of the proposed rent of the park and requiring that a portion of that sum, of an amount necessary to pay the rent on the park for a period of no greater than two (2) years, be kept in escrow for that purpose during the term of the lease.

The right of first refusal created in this section shall inure to a home owners’ association for the time periods provided in this section, beginning on the date of notice to the home owners’ association. The effective period of the right of first refusal shall apply separately for each substantially different bona fide offer to purchase the park or to lease it for a purpose that would result in a discontinuance, and for each offer the same as an offer made more than three (3) months prior to the later offer. However, in the case of the same offer made by a prospective buyer who has previously made an offer for which notice to a home owners’ association was required by this section, the right of first refusal shall apply only if the subsequent offer is made more than six (6) months after the earlier offer. The right of first refusal shall not apply with respect to any offer received by the owner for which notice to a home owners’ association is not required pursuant to this section.

No right of first refusal shall apply to a government taking by eminent domain or negotiated purchase, a forced sale pursuant to a foreclosure, transfer by gift, devise, or operation of law, or a sale to a person who would be included within the table of descent and distribution if there were to be a death intestate of a park owner.

In any instance in which the incorporated home owners’ association of a mobile home park is not the successful purchaser or lessee of the mobile home park, the seller or lessor of the park shall prove compliance with this section by filing an affidavit of compliance in the official land evidence records of the city or town where the property is located within seven (7) days of the sale or lease of the park.

In any instance in which the incorporated homeowners’ association of a mobile home park is the successful purchaser or lessee of the mobile home park, the association shall have the right to distinguish in terms of lease conditions and rent and fees as between members of said association and non-members of said association. For purposes of this chapter, members of a homeowners’ association and non-members of a homeowners’ association shall not be deemed residents of a similar class.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 384, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 198, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 57, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 95.

31-44-3.2.
Mobile home parks — Discontinuance.

In any instance in which a mobile home park is to be sold or leased for any purpose which would result in a discontinuance of the mobile home park, the mobile home park owner shall give at least one year written notice by certified mail return receipt requested to each mobile home resident of the proposed sale or lease.

The mobile home park owner shall pay to any resident who is entitled to receive notice pursuant to this section, relocation benefits of up to four thousand dollars ($4,000) or the actual relocation expenses incurred, whichever is less. The relocation benefits shall be payable within ten (10) days of the departure of the resident and the removal of the mobile home unit from the park. In the event that the resident fails to remove the unit from the park and the park owner is required to remove the unit, the relocation benefits shall be reduced by an amount equal to the documented out of pocket moving costs incurred by the park owner for the physical removal of the unit.

Any mobile home park owner shall provide to each resident who is entitled to receive relocation benefits pursuant to this section, a rental agreement. The agreement shall begin on the date of the issuance of the notice of discontinuance. The provisions of the rental agreement shall not alter in any manner the tenancy arrangement existing between the park owner and resident prior to issuance of the notice of discontinuance, except with respect to the amount of annual rent, which may be increased by an amount not to exceed the increase in the consumer price index for urban consumers, published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, from the calendar year immediately preceding the date upon which the rental agreement is commenced plus the proportionate amount of any documented increase in real estate taxes or other municipal fee or charge; provided, that the total amount of the increase shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the annual rent charged in the immediately preceding year. Once a resident has received a notice of discontinuance, his or her rent, and fees, shall not be increased unless a year has passed from the date of the last increase imposed upon the resident.

Any new resident taking up residence at the park, after the initial notice of discontinuance has been mailed, shall be given a copy of the notice in hand prior to his or her signing a lease and/or placing his or her unit in the park. The new resident shall be provided a form upon which he or she shall acknowledge in writing having received a copy of the notice.

Any new resident taking up residence at the park after the initial notice of discontinuance has been mailed and who receives a copy of the notice of discontinuance provided for in the preceding paragraph shall not be entitled to any relocation benefits as provided for in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 146, § 1.

31-44-3.3.
Future qualified sale of mobile- and manufactured-home community.

The qualified sale of a mobile- or manufactured-home community to a resident-owned organization is exempt from the real estate conveyance tax imposed under chapter 44-25.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 364, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 391, § 2.